Utah statutes.
31A-22-410.   Trustee and deposit agreements.
(1)  An insurer may hold as a part of its general assets the proceeds of any
life insurance policy or annuity under a trust or other agreement, upon the
terms and restrictions as to revocation by the policyholder and control by the
beneficiary, and with the exemptions from the claims of creditors of the
beneficiary as the insurer and the policyholder agree to in writing and as are
otherwise recognized by law.
(2)  An insurer may also receive funds in amounts and upon conditions which
the insurer and the policyholder agree to in writing:
(a)  as premiums in advance upon life insurance policies or annuities; or
(b)  to accumulate for the purchase of future life insurance policies or
annuities.
